Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1854YH (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 682 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15K.1 Recapture of tax expenditures 1 for child labor violations. 2 1. As used in this chapter: 3 a. âBusinessâ means the same as a person as defined in 4 section 4.1. 5 b. âProceedsâ means the same as noncash and cash proceeds 6 as defined in section 554.9102. 7 c. âTax expenditureâ means the same as defined in section 8 2.48, subsection 1. 9 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 10 contrary, beginning on or after July 1, 2025, as a condition 11 of authorizing tax expenditures to a business under any of the 12 programs administered by a department of the state, the value 13 of the tax expenditures authorized by the department shall be 14 subject to recapture by the department administering the tax 15 expenditure if the business, or a contractor, subcontractor, 16 or other third party of the business providing services to the 17 business in the businessâs facility, has violated state or 18 federal child labor laws under chapter 92 or the federal Fair 19 Labor Standards Act of 1938. 20 3. The business shall notify the administering department 21 of the violation within thirty days of the ending of the time 22 period to contest or appeal the violation. 23 4. The repayment or recapture of tax expenditures pursuant 24 to this chapter shall be accomplished in the same manner as 25 provided in section 15.330, subsection 2. 26